Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-352
Insurance companies; name of other company; use; penalty; appeal.

It shall be unlawful for any insurance company to permit the use of its name or for any other company, person, or firm to use the name of any insurance company in such a way as to deceive or mislead the public. The violation of this section or section 44-351 by an insurance company shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of its license, and the person, firm, or corporation so using the name of an insurance company shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars for each offense. An appeal of a suspension, revocation, or fine may be taken, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 33, p. 412;

R.S.1913, § 3169;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 4, p. 591;

C.S.1922, § 7769;

C.S.1929, § 44-304;

R.S.1943, § 44-352;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 14, p. 1274;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 44;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 102.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.